Alabama, session 2026rs, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Health Care Sharing Ministries Tax Parity Act.
Section 2. For the purposes of this act, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Revenue.
(2) HEALTH CARE SHARING MINISTRY. As defined in Section
Page 1

(2) HEALTH CARE SHARING MINISTRY. As defined in Section
SB245 INTRODUCED
22-6A-2, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) QUALIFIED HEALTH CARE SHARING EXPENSES.
Contributions made by a qualified individual to a health care
sharing ministry.
(4) QUALIFIED INDIVIDUAL. A member of a health care
sharing ministry.
Section 3. (a) For tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, a qualified individual is entitled to a
deduction from the qualified individual's adjusted gross
income for the taxable year. The amount of the deduction shall
be equal to the total amount of qualified health care sharing
expenses paid by the qualified individual during the taxable
year.
(b) To receive the deduction allowed by this section, a
qualified individual must claim the deduction on the qualified
individual's annual state tax return or returns in the manner
prescribed by the Alabama Department of Revenue. The qualified
individual shall submit to the department any information the
department determines is necessary to calculate the amount of
the deduction allowed by this section.
(c) Any qualified health care share contribution
received by a taxpayer for medical expenses for which no
deduction against taxable income has been taken shall not be
considered taxable income.
Section 4. The department shall adopt rules to
implement and administer this act.
Section 5. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2